New Jersey, session 221, A4937.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 7 of P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-7) is amended to read as follows: 7.  a.  (1)  The commission shall accept applications from entities for permits to operate as medical cannabis cultivators, medical cannabis manufacturers, and medical cannabis dispensaries.  For the purposes of this section, the term "permit" shall be deemed to include a conditional permit issued pursuant to subsection d. of section 11 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.1) and any permit issued to a microbusiness pursuant to subsection e. of section 11 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.1). (2) (a) For a period of 18 months after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.): (i)    no applicant may concurrently hold more than one permit issued by the commission pursuant to this section, regardless of type; and (ii)   there shall be no more than 28 active medical cannabis cultivator permits, including medical cannabis cultivator permits deemed to be held by alternative treatment centers issued a permit prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) and medical cannabis cultivator permits deemed to be held by alternative treatment centers issued a permit subsequent to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) pursuant to an application submitted prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.); provided that medical cannabis cultivator permits issued to microbusinesses pursuant to subsection e. of section 11 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.1) shall not count toward this limit. (b)   Commencing 18 months after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), a permit holder shall be authorized to concurrently hold a medical cannabis cultivator permit, a medical cannabis manufacturer permit, and a medical cannabis dispensary permit, provided that no permit holder shall be authorized to concurrently hold more than one permit of each type.  The permit holder may submit an application for a permit of any type that the permit holder does not currently hold prior to the expiration of the 18-month period described in subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, provided that no additional permit shall be awarded to the permit holder during the 18-month period. (c) (i) The provisions of subparagraph (a) of this paragraph shall not apply to any alternative treatment center that was issued a permit prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), to any alternative treatment center that was issued a permit after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) pursuant to an application submitted prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), to one of the four alternative treatment centers issued a permit pursuant to an application submitted after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) pursuant to a request for applications published in the New Jersey Register prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) that are expressly exempt from the provisions of subsubparagraph (i) of subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, or to one of the three alternative treatment centers issued a permit pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.1) that are expressly exempt from the provisions of subsubparagraph (i) of subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, which alternative treatment centers shall be deemed to concurrently hold a medical cannabis cultivator permit, a medical cannabis manufacturer permit, and a medical cannabis dispensary permit, and shall be authorized to engage in any conduct authorized pursuant to those permits in relation to the cultivation, manufacturing, and dispensing of medical cannabis. (ii)   In addition, each of the alternative treatment centers described in subsubparagraph (i) of this subparagraph, to which the provisions of subparagraph (a) of this paragraph shall not apply, shall, upon the adoption of the initial rules and regulations by the commission pursuant to subparagraph (a) of paragraph (1) of subsection d. of section 6 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-34), be deemed to either concurrently hold a Class 1 Cannabis Cultivator license, a Class 2 Cannabis Manufacturer License, a Class 5 Cannabis Retailer license, plus an additional Class 5 Cannabis Retailer license for each satellite dispensary authorized and established by the alternative treatment center pursuant to subparagraph (d) of this paragraph, and a Class 6 Cannabis Delivery license, or hold a Class 3 Cannabis Wholesaler license, and may also be deemed to hold a Class 4 Cannabis Distributor license.  Any alternative treatment center deemed to hold one or more licenses as described in this subsubparagraph may begin to operate as any authorized class of cannabis establishment, or establishment and delivery service, or as a cannabis wholesaler and distributor, upon receipt of written approval from the municipality in which the proposed establishment or delivery service, or distributor is to be located and obtaining an initial license or licenses, as applicable, issued by the commission pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection a. of section 33 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-46). (d) (i)  No entity may be issued or concurrently hold more than one medical cannabis cultivator permit, one medical cannabis manufacturer permit, or one medical cannabis dispensary permit at one time[, and no medical cannabis dispensary shall be authorized to establish a satellite location on or after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.),]. [except that an] An alternative treatment center 2[that was issued a permit prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) or that was issued a permit after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) pursuant to an application submitted prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.)] which has been issued a permit to dispense medical cannabis from a medical cannabis dispensary2 shall be authorized to maintain up to two satellite dispensaries 2[, including any satellite dispensary that was approved pursuant to an application submitted prior to or within 18 months after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.).  The three alternative treatment centers issued permits pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.1) that are expressly exempt from the provisions of subsubparagraph (i) of subparagraph (a) of this paragraph shall be authorized to establish and maintain up to one satellite dispensary location, provided that the satellite dispensary was approved pursuant to an application submitted within 18 months after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.)]2. A medical cannabis dispensary seeking to establish a satellite dispensary location shall obtain commission approval in accordance with P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) and P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.) and, upon commission approval, shall be authorized to establish and maintain up to 1[one] two1 satellite dispensary 1[location] locations1. (ii)   Notwithstanding the provisions of subsubparagraph (i) of this subparagraph, an investor, investor group, or fund that provides significant financial or technical assistance or the significant use of intellectual property, or a combination thereof, to an applicant for a medical cannabis dispensary permit, which applicant has been certified as a minority business pursuant to P.L.1986, c.195 (C.52:27H-21.18 et seq.), a women's business pursuant to P.L.1986, c.195 (C.52:27H-21.18 et seq.), or is a disabled-veterans' business, as defined in section 2 of P.L.2015, c.116 (C.52:32-31.2), may own up to a 35 percent interest in up to seven entities that have been issued a medical cannabis dispensary permit, provided that each such medical cannabis dispensary is a certified minority or women's business or a disabled-veterans' business, and the terms of the agreement to provide significant financial or technical assistance or the significant use of intellectual property, or a combination thereof, whether provided in the form of equity, a loan, or otherwise, including interest rates, returns, and fees, are commercially reasonable based on the terms generally provided to comparable businesses.  The terms of the agreement for the provision of significant financial or technical assistance or the significant use of intellectual property, or a combination thereof, may include performance, quality, and other requirements as a condition of providing the financial or technical assistance or use of intellectual property.  An applicant for a medical cannabis dispensary permit that has or will receive significant financial or technical assistance or the significant use of intellectual property under this subsubparagraph shall include with the permit application materials submitted to the commission a copy of the agreement to provide significant financial or technical assistance or significant use of intellectual property, or a combination thereof, which agreement shall be subject to review by the commission as provided in subsection f. of section 11 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.1). An applicant for a medical cannabis dispensary permit that receives significant financial or technical assistance or the significant use of intellectual property under this subsubparagraph shall pay back to the investor, investor group, or fund the full value of the financial or technical assistance or intellectual property provided under the agreement, plus any applicable interest and fees, in a period not less than five years after the date of the agreement if the full value of the assistance or property is less than $100,000, in a period not less than seven years after the date of the agreement if the full value of the assistance or property is between $100,001 and $250,000, in a period not less than 10 years after the date of agreement if the full value of the assistance or property is between $250,001 and $500,000, and, subject to any terms and conditions imposed by a lender, in a period not less than 10 years after the date of the agreement if the full value of the assistance or property is greater than $500,000.  An investor, investor group, or fund that has acquired an ownership interest in one or more entities that have been issued a medical cannabis dispensary permit as authorized under this subsubparagraph may maintain the ownership interest after the date the full value of the financial or technical assistance or use of intellectual property provided under the agreement, plus interest and fees, has been repaid by the applicant that received the assistance or use of intellectual property. In no case may the controlling interest in the entity that holds a medical cannabis dispensary permit in which an investor, investor group, or fund owns an interest as authorized under this subsubparagraph revert to the investor, investor group, or fund in the event of a default or failure by the certified minority or women's business or disabled-veterans' business, as applicable, and any such controlling interest may only be transferred to a certified minority or women's business or a disabled-veterans' business. An entity issued a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, or medical cannabis dispensary permit, or an individual associated with the ownership or management of such entity, may invest in or participate in an investor group or a fund that meets the requirements of this subsubparagraph with respect to a Class 5 cannabis retailer license or an alternative treatment center permit. (e)   No entity issued a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, or medical cannabis dispensary permit may concurrently hold a clinical registrant permit issued pursuant to section 13 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.3), and no entity issued a clinical registrant permit pursuant to section 13 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.3) may concurrently hold a medical cannabis cultivator permit, a medical cannabis manufacturer permit, or a medical cannabis dispensary permit. (f)   Any medical cannabis dispensary permit holder may be approved by the commission to operate a cannabis consumption area, provided that the permit holder otherwise meets the requirements of section 28 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-21). (g)   An alternative treatment center that was issued a permit prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), that was issued a permit after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) pursuant to an application submitted pursuant to a request for applications published in the New Jersey Register prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), or that was issued a permit after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) pursuant to an application submitted prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), shall be required to submit an attestation signed by a bona fide labor organization stating that the alternative treatment center has entered into a labor peace agreement with such bona fide labor organization no later than 100 days after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) or no later than 100 days after the date the alternative treatment center first opens, whichever date is later.  The maintenance of a labor peace agreement with a bona fide labor organization shall be an ongoing material condition of maintaining the alternative treatment center's permit.  The failure to submit an attestation as required pursuant to this subparagraph within 100 days after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) or within 100 days after the alternative treatment center first opens, as applicable, shall result in the suspension or revocation of the alternative treatment center's permit, provided that the commission may grant an extension to this deadline to the alternative treatment center based upon extenuating circumstances or for good cause shown. As used in this subparagraph, "bona fide labor organization" means a labor organization of any kind or employee representation committee, group, or association, in which employees participate and which exists and is constituted for the purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining or otherwise dealing with medical or personal use cannabis employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, terms or conditions of employment, including wages and rates of pay, or other mutual aid or protection in connection with employment, and may be characterized by: it being a party to one or more executed collective bargaining agreements with medical or personal use cannabis employers, in this State or another state; it having a written constitution or bylaws in the three immediately preceding years; it filing the annual financial report required of labor organizations pursuant to subsection (b) of 29 U.S.C. s.431, or it having at least one audited financial report in the three immediately preceding years; it being affiliated with any regional or national association of unions, including but not limited to state and federal labor councils; or it being a member of a national labor organization that has at least 500 general members in a majority of the 50 states of the United States. (h) An alternative treatment center that was issued a permit prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), that was issued a permit after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) pursuant to an application submitted pursuant to a request for applications published in the New Jersey Register prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), or that was issued a permit after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) pursuant to an application submitted prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), shall be permitted to cultivate from up to two physical locations, provided that the alternative treatment center's combined mature cannabis plant grow canopy between both locations shall not exceed 150,000 square feet of bloom space or the square footage of canopy permitted under the largest tier in the tiered system adopted by the commission pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection b. of section 21 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-38). (3)   The commission shall seek to ensure the availability of a sufficient number of medical cannabis cultivators, medical cannabis manufacturers, and medical cannabis dispensaries throughout the State, pursuant to need, including at least two each in the northern, central, and southern regions of the State. Medical cannabis cultivators, medical cannabis manufacturers, and medical cannabis dispensaries issued permits pursuant to this section may be nonprofit or for-profit entities. (4)   The commission shall periodically evaluate whether the number of medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, and medical cannabis dispensary permits issued are sufficient to meet the needs of qualifying patients in the State, and shall accept new applications and issue such additional permits as shall be necessary to meet those needs.  The types of permits requested and issued, and the locations of any additional permits that are authorized, shall be in the discretion of the commission based on the needs of qualifying patients in the State. (5)   (a) A medical cannabis cultivator shall be authorized to: acquire a reasonable initial and ongoing inventory, as determined by the commission, of cannabis seeds or seedlings and paraphernalia; possess, cultivate, plant, grow, harvest, and package medical cannabis, including prerolled forms, for any authorized purpose, including, but not limited to, research purposes; and deliver, transfer, transport, distribute, supply, or sell medical cannabis and related supplies to any medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant in the State.  In no case shall a medical cannabis cultivator operate or be located on land that is valued, assessed or taxed as an agricultural or horticultural use pursuant to the "Farmland Assessment Act of 1964," P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.). (b)   A medical cannabis manufacturer shall be authorized to: purchase or acquire medical cannabis from any medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, or clinical registrant in the State; possess and utilize medical cannabis in the manufacture and creation of medical cannabis products; and deliver, transfer, transport, supply, or sell medical cannabis products and related supplies to any medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant in the State. (c)   A medical cannabis dispensary shall be authorized to: purchase or acquire medical cannabis from any medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant in the State and medical cannabis products and related supplies from any medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant in the State; purchase or acquire paraphernalia from any legal source; and distribute, supply, sell, or dispense medical cannabis, medical cannabis products, paraphernalia, and related supplies to qualifying patients or their designated or institutional caregivers who are registered with the commission pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-4).  A medical cannabis dispensary may furnish medical cannabis, medical cannabis products, paraphernalia, and related supplies to a medical cannabis handler for delivery to a registered qualifying patient, designated caregiver, or institutional caregiver consistent with the requirements of subsection i. of section 27 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-20). (6)   A medical cannabis cultivator shall not be limited in the number of strains of medical cannabis cultivated, and a medical cannabis manufacturer shall not be limited in the number or type of medical cannabis products manufactured or created.  A medical cannabis manufacturer may package, and a medical cannabis dispensary may directly dispense medical cannabis and medical cannabis products to qualifying patients and their designated and institutional caregivers in any authorized form.  Authorized forms shall include dried form, oral lozenges, topical formulations, transdermal form, sublingual form, tincture form, or edible form, or any other form as authorized by the commission.  Edible form shall include pills, tablets, capsules, drops or syrups, oils, chewable forms, and any other form as authorized by the commission, except that the edible forms made available to minor patients shall be limited to forms that are medically appropriate for children, including pills, tablets, capsules, chewable forms, and drops, oils, syrups, and other liquids. (7)   Nonprofit medical cannabis cultivators, medical cannabis manufacturers, and medical cannabis dispensaries need not be recognized as a 501(c)(3) organization by the federal Internal Revenue Service. b.    The commission shall require that an applicant provide such information as the commission determines to be necessary pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.). c.     A person who has been convicted of a crime of the first, second, or third degree under New Jersey law or of a crime involving any controlled dangerous substance or controlled substance analog as set forth in chapter 35 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes except paragraph (11) or (12) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:35-5, or paragraph (3) or (4) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:35-10, or any similar law of the United States or any other state shall not be issued a permit to operate as a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant or be a director, officer, or employee of a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant, unless such conviction occurred after the effective date of P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) and was for a violation of federal law relating to possession or sale of cannabis for conduct that is authorized under P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) or P.L.2015, c.158 (C.18A:40-12.22 et al.). d.  (1) The commission shall require each applicant seeking a permit to operate as, to be a director, officer, or employee of, or to be a significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant to undergo a criminal history record background check. Any individual seeking to become a director, officer, or employee of a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant, after issuance of an initial permit shall notify the commission and shall complete a criminal history record background check and provide all information as may be required by the commission as a condition of assuming a position as director, officer, or employee of the permitted entity.  An individual who secures an investment interest or gains the authority to make controlling decisions in a permitted entity that makes the individual a significantly involved person shall notify the commission, complete a criminal history record background check, and provide all information as may be required by the commission no later than 30 days after the date the individual becomes a significantly involved person, or any permit issued to the individual or group of which the significantly involved person is a member shall be revoked and the individual or group shall be deemed ineligible to hold any ownership or investment interest in a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant for a period of at least two years, commencing from the date of revocation, and for such additional period of time as the commission deems appropriate, based on the duration of the nondisclosure, the size of the individual's or group's investment interest in the permitted entity, the amount of profits, revenue, or income realized by the individual or group from the permitted entity during the period of nondisclosure, and whether the individual had a disqualifying conviction or would otherwise have been deemed ineligible to be a significantly involved person in a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant. For purposes of this section, the term "applicant" shall include any owner, director, officer, or employee of, and any significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant.  The commission is authorized to exchange fingerprint data with and receive criminal history record background information from the Division of State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation consistent with the provisions of applicable State and federal laws, rules, and regulations.  The Division of State Police shall forward criminal history record background information to the commission in a timely manner when requested pursuant to the provisions of this section. An applicant who is required to undergo a criminal history record background check pursuant to this section shall submit to being fingerprinted in accordance with applicable State and federal laws, rules, and regulations.  No check of criminal history record background information shall be performed pursuant to this section unless the applicant has furnished the applicant's written consent to that check.  An applicant who is required to undergo a criminal history record background check pursuant to this section who refuses to consent to, or cooperate in, the securing of a check of criminal history record background information shall not be considered for a permit to operate, or authorization to be employed at or to be a significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant.  An applicant shall bear the cost for the criminal history record background check, including all costs of administering and processing the check. (2)   The commission shall not approve an applicant for a permit to operate, or authorization to be employed at or to be a significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant if the criminal history record background information of the applicant reveals a disqualifying conviction as set forth in subsection c. of this section. (3)   Upon receipt of the criminal history record background information from the Division of State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the commission shall provide written notification to the applicant of the applicant's qualification or disqualification for a permit to operate or be a director, officer, or employee of, or a significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant. If the applicant is disqualified because of a disqualifying conviction pursuant to the provisions of this section, the conviction that constitutes the basis for the disqualification shall be identified in the written notice. (4)   The Division of State Police shall promptly notify the commission in the event that an individual who was the subject of a criminal history record background check conducted pursuant to this section is convicted of a crime or offense in this State after the date the background check was performed.  Upon receipt of that notification, the commission shall make a determination regarding the continued eligibility to operate or be a director, officer, or employee of, or a significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant. (5)   Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection c. of this section to the contrary, the commission may offer provisional authority for an applicant to be an owner, director, officer, or employee of, or a significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant for a period not to exceed three months if the applicant submits to the commission a sworn statement attesting that the person has not been convicted of any disqualifying conviction pursuant to this section. (6)   Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection c. of this section to the contrary, no applicant to be an owner, director, officer, or employee of, or a significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant shall be disqualified on the basis of any conviction disclosed by a criminal history record background check conducted pursuant to this section if the individual has affirmatively demonstrated to the commission clear and convincing evidence of rehabilitation.  In determining whether clear and convincing evidence of rehabilitation has been demonstrated, the following factors shall be considered: (a)   the nature and responsibility of the position which the convicted individual would hold, has held, or currently holds; (b)   the nature and seriousness of the crime or offense; (c)   the circumstances under which the crime or offense occurred; (d)   the date of the crime or offense; (e)   the age of the individual when the crime or offense was committed; (f)   whether the crime or offense was an isolated or repeated incident; (g)   any social conditions which may have contributed to the commission of the crime or offense; and (h)   any evidence of rehabilitation, including good conduct in prison or in the community, counseling or psychiatric treatment received, acquisition of additional academic or vocational schooling, successful participation in correctional work-release programs, or the recommendation of those who have had the individual under their supervision. e.     The commission shall issue a permit to operate or be an owner, director, officer, or employee of, or a significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, or medical cannabis dispensary if the commission finds that issuing such a permit would be consistent with the purposes of P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) and the requirements of this section and section 11 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.1) are met.  The denial of an application shall be considered a final agency decision, subject to review by the Appellate Division of the Superior Court.  A permit to operate a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, or medical cannabis dispensary issued on or after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) shall be valid for one year and shall be renewable annually. f.     A person who has been issued a permit pursuant to this section or a clinical registrant permit pursuant to section 13 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.3) shall display the permit at the front entrance to the premises of the permitted facility at all times when the facility is engaged in conduct authorized pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) involving medical cannabis, including, but not limited to, the cultivating, manufacturing, or dispensing of medical cannabis. g.    A medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant shall report any change in information to the commission not later than 10 days after such change, or the permit shall be deemed null and void. h.    Each medical cannabis dispensary and clinical registrant shall maintain and make available on its Internet website, if any, a standard price list that shall apply to all medical cannabis, medical cannabis products, and related supplies and paraphernalia sold or dispensed by the medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant, which prices shall be reasonable and consistent with the actual costs incurred by the medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant in connection with acquiring and selling, transferring, or dispensing the medical cannabis or medical cannabis product and related supplies and paraphernalia.  The prices charged by the medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant shall not deviate from the prices indicated on the entity's current price list, provided that a price list maintained by a medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant may allow for medical cannabis to be made available at a reduced price or without charge to qualifying patients who have a demonstrated financial hardship, as that term shall be defined by the commission by regulation.  A price list required pursuant to this subsection may be revised no more than once per month, and each medical cannabis dispensary and clinical registrant shall be responsible for ensuring that the commission has a copy of the facility's current price list.  A medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant shall be liable to a civil penalty of $1,000 for each sale that occurs at a price that deviates from the entity's current price list, and to a civil penalty of $10,000 for each week during which the entity's current price list is not on file with the commission.  Any civil penalties collected by the commission pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the "Cannabis Regulatory, Enforcement Assistance, and Marketplace Modernization Fund" established under section 41 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-50), and used by the commission for the purposes of administering the State medical cannabis program. i.     The commission shall adopt regulations to: (1)   require such written documentation of each delivery or dispensation of cannabis to, and pickup of cannabis for, a registered qualifying patient, including the date and amount dispensed, and, in the case of delivery, the date and times the delivery commenced and was completed, the address where the medical cannabis was delivered, the name of the patient or caregiver to whom the medical cannabis was delivered, and the name, handler certification number, and delivery certification number of the medical cannabis handler who performed the delivery, to be maintained in the records of the medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant, as the commission determines necessary to ensure effective documentation of the operations of each medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant; (2)   monitor, oversee, and investigate all activities performed by medical cannabis cultivators, medical cannabis manufacturers, medical cannabis dispensaries, and clinical registrants; (3)   ensure adequate security of all facilities 24 hours per day and security of all delivery methods to registered qualifying patients; and (4)   establish thresholds for administrative action to be taken against a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant and its employees, officers, investors, directors, or governing board pursuant to subsection m. of this section, including, but not limited to, specific penalties or disciplinary actions that may be imposed in a summary proceeding. j.     (1) Each medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, and clinical registrant shall require the owners, directors, officers, and employees at the permitted facility to complete at least eight hours of ongoing training each calendar year.  The training shall be tailored to the roles and responsibilities of the individual's job function, and shall include training on confidentiality and such other topics as shall be required by the commission. (2)   Each medical cannabis dispensary and clinical registrant shall consider whether to make interpreter services available to the population served, including for individuals with a visual or hearing impairment.  The commission shall provide assistance to any medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant that seeks to provide such services in locating appropriate interpreter resources.  A medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant shall assume the cost of providing interpreter services pursuant to this subsection. k.  (1) The first six alternative treatment centers issued permits following the effective date of P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) shall be authorized to sell or transfer such permit and other assets to a for-profit entity, provided that:  the sale or transfer is approved by the commission; each owner, director, officer, and employee of, and significantly involved person in, the entity seeking to purchase or receive the transfer of the permit, undergoes a criminal history record background check pursuant to subsection d. of this section, provided that nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require any individual to undergo a criminal history record background check if the individual would otherwise be exempt from undergoing a criminal history record background check pursuant to subsection d. of this section; the commission finds that the sale or transfer of the permit would be consistent with the purposes of P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.); and no such sale or transfer shall be authorized more than one year after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.).  The sale or transfer of a permit pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to the requirements of the "New Jersey Nonprofit Corporation Act," N.J.S.15A:1-1 et seq., provided that, prior to or at the time of the sale or transfer, all debts and obligations of the nonprofit entity are either paid in full or assumed by the for-profit entity purchasing or acquiring the permit, or a reserve fund is established for the purpose of paying in full the debts and obligations of the nonprofit entity, and the for-profit entity pays the full value of all assets held by the nonprofit entity, as reflected on the nonprofit entity's balance sheet, in addition to the agreed-upon price for the sale or transfer of the entity's alternative treatment center permit.  Until such time as the members of the Cannabis Regulatory Commission are appointed and the commission first organizes, the Department of Health shall have full authority to approve a sale or transfer pursuant to this paragraph. (2)   The sale or transfer of any interest of five percent or more in a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit shall be subject to approval by the commission and conditioned on the entity that is purchasing or receiving transfer of the interest in the medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit completing a criminal history record background check pursuant to the requirements of subsection d. of this section. l.     No employee of any department, division, agency, board, or other State, county, or local government entity involved in the process of reviewing, processing, or making determinations with regard to medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit applications shall have any direct or indirect financial interest in the cultivating, manufacturing, or dispensing of medical cannabis or related paraphernalia, or otherwise receive anything of value from an applicant for a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit in exchange for reviewing, processing, or making any recommendations with respect to a permit application. m.   In the event that a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant fails to comply with any requirements set forth in P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) or any related law or regulation, the commission may invoke penalties or take administrative action against the medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant and its employees, officers, investors, directors, or governing board, including, but not limited to, assessing fines, referring matters to another State agency, and suspending or terminating any permit held by the medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant.  Any penalties imposed or administrative actions taken by the commission pursuant to this subsection may be imposed in a summary proceeding. (cf: P.L.2023, c.162, s.3) 22. Section 31 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-24) is amended to read as follows: 31.  a.  The Cannabis Regulatory Commission is hereby created in, but not of, the Department of the Treasury, to: (1)   assume all powers, duties, and responsibilities with regard to the regulation and oversight of activities authorized pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) from the Department of Health for the further development, expansion, regulation, and enforcement of activities associated with the medical use of cannabis pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.).  All powers, duties, and responsibilities with regard to the regulation and oversight of activities authorized pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) shall be transferred from the Department of Health to the Cannabis Regulatory Commission at such time as the members of the commission are appointed as provided in subsection b. of this section and the commission first organizes.  Thereafter, any reference to the Department of Health or the Commissioner of Health in any statute or regulation pertaining to the provisions of P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) shall be deemed to refer to the Cannabis Regulatory Commission. The provisions of this paragraph shall be carried out in accordance with the "State Agency Transfer Act," P.L.1971, c.375 (C.52:14D-1 et seq.); and (2)   oversee the development, regulation, and enforcement of activities associated with the personal use of cannabis pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.). b.  (1)  The commission shall consist of five members, one of whom shall be designated by the Governor as the chair, and one of whom shall be designated the vice-chair in accordance with the appointment process set forth in paragraph (7) of this subsection. (2)   The members of the commission shall be directly appointed [by the Governor] as follows: (a)   One member shall be appointed [upon recommendation of] by the Senate President; (b)   One member shall be appointed [upon recommendation of] by the Speaker of the General Assembly; (c)   Three members, including the chair, shall be appointed [without any needed recommendation] by the Governor. (3)   Initial appointments of commission members pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection shall not require the advice and consent of the Senate.  Subsequent appointments made pursuant to subparagraph (c) of paragraph (2) of this subsection, including reappointments of members initially appointed, shall be made with the advice and consent of the Senate.  Subsequent appointments made pursuant to subparagraphs (a) and (b) of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be made in the same manner as the original appointment. (4)   All five members shall be residents of this State.  At least one member shall be a State representative of a national organization or State branch of a national organization with a stated mission of studying, advocating, or adjudicating against minority historical oppression, past and present discrimination, unemployment, poverty and income inequality, and other forms of social injustice or inequality, and all five members shall possess education, training, or experience with legal, policy, or criminal justice issues, corporate or industry management, finance, securities, or production or distribution, medicine or pharmacology, or public health, mental health, or substance use disorders. (5)   The chair and the other members shall serve for terms of five years; provided that, for the two other members initially appointed by the Governor without any needed recommendation, one shall be appointed for a term of four years, and one shall be appointed for a term of three years.  The chair and the other members shall serve in their respective capacities throughout their entire term and until their successors shall have been duly appointed and qualified.  Any vacancy in the commission occurring for any reason other than the expiration of a term, including a vacancy occurring during the term of the initial chair or another initial member, shall be filled in accordance with the requirements for subsequent appointments set forth in paragraph (3) of this subsection for the remainder of the unexpired term only. (6)   (a) The chair and other members of the commission shall devote full time to their respective duties of office and shall not pursue or engage in any other business, occupation, or gainful employment.  Each member shall receive an annual salary to be fixed and established by the Governor, which for the chair shall not exceed $141,000, and for the other members shall not exceed $125,000. (b)   Notwithstanding subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, a member may hold local elected office, provided that, in the judgment of the State Ethics Commission and Local Finance Board of the Department of Community Affairs, such office or employment will not interfere with the members responsibilities to the commission, and will not create a conflict of interest, or reasonable risk of the public perception of a conflict of interest, on the part of the member. (7)   The members of the commission, at the commission's first meeting when called by the chair, shall elect, by a majority of the total authorized membership of the commission, one of the members who is appointed based upon the recommendation of the Senate President or Speaker of the General Assembly as set forth in paragraph (2) of this subsection to serve as vice-chair during that member's term.  A new vice-chair shall be elected upon the expiration of the current vice-chair's term, even if that member remains on the commission until that member's successor is duly appointed and qualified.  The vice-chair shall be empowered to carry out all of the responsibilities of the chair during the chair's absence, disqualification, or inability to serve. (8)   A majority of the total authorized membership of the commission shall be required to establish a quorum, and a majority of the total authorized membership of the commission shall be required to exercise its powers at any meeting thereof.  However, only if all five commissioners have been duly appointed in accordance with the appointment process set forth in paragraph (2) of this subsection, and five appointed commissioners are present at a meeting, may a majority of the total authorized membership act to assume the powers, duties, and responsibilities with regard to the regulation and oversight of activities authorized pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) from the Department of Health; and similarly, only if all five appointed commissioners are present at a meeting, may a majority of the total authorized membership act to adopt the commission's initial rules and regulations concerning personal use cannabis pursuant to subparagraph (a) of paragraph (1) of subsection d. of section 6 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-34), by which the licensing of cannabis establishments, distributors, and delivery services, and the lawfully permitted licensing activities of those establishments, distributors, and delivery services may begin. (9)   The commission shall adopt annually a schedule of regular meetings, and special meetings may be held at the call of the chair. (10)  Any member of the commission may be removed from office by the Governor, for cause, upon notice and opportunity to be heard at a public hearing.  Any member of the commission shall automatically forfeit the member's office upon conviction for any crime. c.  (1)  The commission shall establish, and from time to time alter, a plan of organization, and employ personnel as it deems necessary under the direct supervision of a full-time executive director for the commission.  The plan of organization shall include the Office of Minority, Disabled Veterans, and Women Cannabis Business Development established by section 32 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-25). (a)   The initial executive director shall be appointed by the Governor, and thereafter every subsequent executive director shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.  The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing Governor during the Governor's term of office and until a successor has been duly appointed and qualified.  Any vacancy in the office occurring for any reason other than the expiration of a term, including a vacancy occurring during the term of the initial executive director, shall be filled for the unexpired term only in the same manner as the appointment of any subsequent executive director as set forth herein.  The executive director shall receive an annual salary to be fixed and established by the Governor, which shall not exceed $141,000. (b)  (i)  All employees of the commission under the direct supervision of the executive director, except for secretarial and clerical personnel, shall be in the State's unclassified service.  All employees shall be deemed confidential employees for the purposes of the "New Jersey Employer-Employee Relations Act," P.L.1941, c.100 (C.34:13A-1 et seq.). (ii)   If, as a result of transferring powers, duties, and responsibilities with regard to the regulation and oversight of activities authorized pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) from the Department of Health to the commission pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the commission needs to employ an individual to fill a position, employees of the department who performed the duties of the position to be filled shall be given a one-time right of first refusal offer of employment with the commission, and such employees may be removed by the commission for cause or if deemed unqualified to hold the position, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary.  A department employee who becomes employed by the commission shall retain as an employee of the commission the seniority, and all rights related to seniority, that the employee had with the department as of the last day of employment with the department; provided, however, that such seniority and seniority rights shall be retained only by an employee who was transferred from employment with the department to employment with the commission, and shall not be retained by an employee who was removed from employment with the department due to layoff procedures or who resigned from a position with the department prior to being hired by the commission. (2)   The commission may sue and be sued in any court, employ legal counsel to represent the commission in any proceeding to which it is a party and render legal advice to the commission upon its request, as well as contract for the services of other professional, technical, and operational personnel and consultants as may be necessary to the performance of its responsibilities. (3)   The commission may incur additional expenses within the limits of funds available to it in order to carry out its duties, functions, and powers under P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) and P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.). d.    With respect to the activities of the commission, neither the President of the Senate or the Speaker of the General Assembly shall be permitted to appear or practice or act in any capacity whatsoever before the commission regarding any matter whatsoever, nor shall any member of the immediate family of the Governor, President of the Senate, or Speaker of the General Assembly be permitted to so practice or appear in any capacity whatsoever before the commission regarding any matter whatsoever.  As used in this subsection, "immediate family" means the spouse, domestic partner, or civil union partner, and any dependent child or stepchild, recognized by blood or by law, of the Governor, President of the Senate, or Speaker of the General Assembly, or of the spouse, domestic partner, or civil union partner residing in the same household as the Governor, President of the Senate, or Speaker of the General Assembly. e.     The commission may designate its powers and authority as it deems necessary and appropriate to carry out its duties and implement the provisions of P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) and P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.). f.     The commission shall, no later than three years after the date it first organizes, contract with a public research university, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A:3B-3), to conduct an independent study to review: (1)   the commission's organization; (2)   the commission's regulation and enforcement activities; (3)   the overall effectiveness of the commission as a full time entity; and (4)   whether the regulation and oversight of medical cannabis or personal use cannabis could be more effectively and efficiently managed through a reorganization of the commission, consolidation of the commission within the Department of Health or another Executive Branch department, conversion to a part-time commission, or the transfer of some or all of the commission's operations elsewhere within the Executive Branch. The commission shall submit the findings of the independent study, along with the commission's recommendations for appropriate executive, administrative, or legislative action, to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature.2 (cf: P.L.2021, c.16, s.5) 23.   Section 4 of P.L.1981, c.142 (C.52:13D-17.2) is amended to read as follows: 4.  a.  As used in this section "person" means: (1)  (a)  with respect to casino activity, activity related to medical cannabis authorized pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.), and activity related to personal use cannabis authorized pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.): the Governor; the President of the Senate; the Speaker of the General Assembly; any full-time member of the Judiciary; any full-time professional employee of the Office of the Governor; the head of a principal department; the assistant or deputy heads of a principal department, including all assistant and deputy commissioners; the head of any division of a principal department; (b)   with respect to casino activity: any State officer or employee subject to financial disclosure by law or executive order and any other State officer or employee with responsibility for matters affecting casino activity; any special State officer or employee with responsibility for matters affecting casino activity; any member of the Legislature; any full-time professional employee of the Legislature; members of the Casino Reinvestment Development Authority; or (c)   with respect to activity related to medical cannabis authorized pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) and activity related to personal use cannabis authorized pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.): any State officer or employee subject to financial disclosure by law or executive order and any other State officer or employee with responsibility for matters affecting medical cannabis activity or personal use cannabis activity; any special State officer or employee with responsibility for matters affecting medical cannabis activity or personal use cannabis activity; members of the Cannabis Regulatory Commission; or (2)  (a)  any member of the governing body, or the municipal judge or the municipal attorney of a municipality wherein a casino is located; any member of or attorney for the planning board or zoning board of adjustment of a municipality wherein a casino is located, or any professional planner, or consultant regularly employed or retained by such planning board or zoning board of adjustment; or (b)   any member of the governing body or the municipal judge of a municipality, any member of the planning board or zoning board of adjustment, or any professional planner, or consultant regularly employed or retained by such planning board or zoning board of adjustment, of a municipality wherein a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant issued a permit pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.), or wherein a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service issued a license pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.), is located. b.  (1)  No State officer or employee, nor any person, nor any member of the immediate family of any State officer or employee, or person, nor any partnership, firm, or corporation with which any such State officer or employee or person is associated or in which he has an interest, nor any partner, officer, director, or employee while he is associated with such partnership, firm, or corporation, shall hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in, or hold employment with, or represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, any holder of, or applicant for, a casino license, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto, in connection with any cause, application, or matter, except as provided in section 3 of P.L.2009, c.26 (C.52:13D-17.3), and except that (a) a State officer or employee other than a State officer or employee included in the definition of person, and (b) a member of the immediate family of a State officer or employee, or of a person, may hold employment with the holder of, or applicant for, a casino license if, in the judgment of the State Ethics Commission, the Joint Legislative Committee on Ethical Standards, or the Supreme Court, as appropriate, such employment will not interfere with the responsibilities of the State officer or employee, or person, and will not create a conflict of interest, or reasonable risk of the public perception of a conflict of interest, on the part of the State officer or employee, or person. No special State officer or employee without responsibility for matters affecting casino activity, excluding those serving in the Departments of Education, Health, and Human Services and the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education, shall hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in any holder of, or applicant for, a casino license, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto. However, a special State officer or employee without responsibility for matters affecting casino activity may hold employment directly with, or may represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, any holder of or applicant for a casino license or any holding or intermediary company thereof and if so employed may hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in, or represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, that employer, except as otherwise prohibited by law. (2)   No State officer or employee, nor any person, nor any member of the immediate family of any State officer or employee, or person, nor any partnership, firm, or corporation with which any such State officer or employee or person is associated or in which he has an interest, nor any partner, officer, director, or employee while he is associated with such partnership, firm, or corporation, shall hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in, or hold employment with, or represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, or derive any remuneration, payment, benefit, or any other thing of value for any services, including but not limited to consulting or similar services, from any holder of, or applicant for, a license, permit, or other approval to conduct Internet gaming, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto, or any Internet gaming affiliate of any holder of, or applicant for, a casino license, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto, or any business, association, enterprise, or other entity that is organized, in whole or in part, for the purpose of promoting, advocating for, or advancing the interests of the Internet gaming industry generally or any Internet gaming-related business or businesses in connection with any cause, application, or matter, except as provided in section 3 of P.L.2009, c.26 (C.52:13D-17.3), and except that (a) a State officer or employee other than a State officer or employee included in the definition of person, and (b) a member of the immediate family of a State officer or employee, or of a person, may hold employment with the holder of, or applicant for, a license, permit, or other approval to conduct Internet gaming, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto, or any Internet gaming affiliate of any holder of, or applicant for, a casino license, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto if, in the judgment of the State Ethics Commission, the Joint Legislative Committee on Ethical Standards, or the Supreme Court, as appropriate, such employment will not interfere with the responsibilities of the State officer or employee, or person, and will not create a conflict of interest, or reasonable risk of the public perception of a conflict of interest, on the part of the State officer or employee, or person. (3)   No State officer or employee, nor any person, nor any member of the immediate family of any State officer or employee, or person, nor any partnership, firm, or corporation with which any such State officer or employee or person is associated or in which he has an interest, nor any partner, officer, director, or employee while he is associated with such partnership, firm, or corporation, shall hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in, or hold employment with, or represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, any holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit issued pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license issued pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.), or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto, in connection with any cause, application, or matter, except as provided in section 3 of P.L.2009, c.26 (C.52:13D-17.3), and except that (a) a State officer or employee other than a State officer or employee included in the definition of person, and (b) a member of the immediate family of a State officer or employee, or of a person, may hold employment with the holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service, if, in the judgment of the State Ethics Commission, the Joint Legislative Committee on Ethical Standards, or the Supreme Court, as appropriate, such employment will not interfere with the responsibilities of the State officer or employee, or person, and will not create a conflict of interest, or reasonable risk of the public perception of a conflict of interest, on the part of the State officer or employee, or person. No special State officer or employee without responsibility for matters affecting medical cannabis activity or personal use cannabis activity , excluding those serving in the Departments of Education, Health, and Human Services and the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education, shall hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in any holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto.  However, a special State officer or employee without responsibility for matters affecting medical cannabis activity or personal use cannabis activity may hold employment directly with, or may represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, any holder of or applicant for a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit, or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or any holding or intermediary company thereof, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto, and if so employed may hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in, or represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, that employer, except as otherwise prohibited by law. c.  (1)  No person or any member of his immediate family, nor any partnership, firm, or corporation with which such person is associated or in which he has an interest, nor any partner, officer, director, or employee while he is associated with such partnership, firm or corporation, shall, within two years next subsequent to the termination of the office or employment of such person, hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in, or hold employment with, or represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, any holder of, or applicant for, a casino license in connection with any cause, application or matter, or any holding or intermediary company with respect to such holder of, or applicant for, a casino license in connection with any phase of casino development, permitting, licensure, or any other matter whatsoever related to casino activity, except as provided in section 3 of P.L.2009, c.26 (C.52:13D-17.3), and except that: (a)   a member of the immediate family of a person may hold employment with the holder of, or applicant for, a casino license if, in the judgment of the State Ethics Commission, the Joint Legislative Committee on Ethical Standards, or the Supreme Court, as appropriate, such employment will not interfere with the responsibilities of the person and will not create a conflict of interest, or reasonable risk of the public perception of a conflict of interest, on the part of the person; (b)   an employee who is terminated as a result of a reduction in the workforce at the agency where employed, other than an employee who held a policy-making management position at any time during the five years prior to termination of employment, may, at any time prior to the end of the two-year period, accept employment with the holder of, or applicant for, a casino license if, in the judgment of the State Ethics Commission, the Joint Legislative Committee on Ethical Standards, or the Supreme Court, as appropriate, such employment will not create a conflict of interest, or reasonable risk of the public perception of a conflict of interest, on the part of the employee. In no case shall the restrictions of this subsection apply to a secretarial or clerical employee. Nothing herein contained shall alter or amend the post-employment restrictions applicable to members and employees of the Casino Control Commission and employees and agents of the Division of Gaming Enforcement pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection e. of section 59 and section 60 of P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-59 and C.5:12-60); and (c)   any partnership, firm, or corporation engaged in the practice of law or in providing any other professional services with which any person included in subparagraphs (a) and (b) of paragraph (1) of subsection a. of this section, or a member of the immediate family of that person, is associated, and any partner, officer, director, or employee thereof, other than that person, or immediate family member, may represent, appear for or negotiate on behalf of any holder of, or applicant for, a casino license in connection with any cause, application or matter or any holding company or intermediary company with respect to such holder of, or applicant for, a casino license in connection with any phase of casino development, permitting, licensure or any other matter whatsoever related to casino activity, and that person or immediate family member shall not be barred from association with such partnership, firm or corporation, if for a period of two years next subsequent to the termination of the person's office or employment, the person or immediate family member (i) is screened from personal participation in any such representation, appearance or negotiation; and (ii) is associated with the partnership, firm or corporation in a position which does not entail any equity interest in the partnership, firm or corporation.  The exception provided in this subparagraph shall not apply to a former Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, member of the Legislature, person included in subparagraph (a) of paragraph (2) of subsection a. of this section, or to the members of their immediate families. (2)   No person or any member of the person's immediate family, nor any partnership, firm, or corporation with which such person is associated or in which the person has an interest, nor any partner, officer, director, or employee while the person is associated with such partnership, firm, or corporation, shall, within two years next subsequent to the termination of the office or employment of such person, hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in, or hold employment with, or represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, any holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit issued pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license issued pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.) or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service in connection with any cause, application, or matter, or any holding or intermediary company with respect to such holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service in connection with any phase of development, permitting, licensure, or any other matter whatsoever related to medical cannabis activity or personal use cannabis activity, except as provided in section 3 of P.L.2009, c.26 (C.52:13D-17.3), and except that: (a)   a member of the immediate family of a person may hold employment with the holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit issued pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license issued pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.) or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service if, in the judgment of the State Ethics Commission, the Joint Legislative Committee on Ethical Standards, or the Supreme Court, as appropriate, such employment will not interfere with the responsibilities of the person and will not create a conflict of interest, or reasonable risk of the public perception of a conflict of interest, on the part of the person; (b)   an employee who is terminated as a result of a reduction in the workforce at the agency where employed, other than an employee who held a policy-making management position at any time during the five years prior to termination of employment, may, at any time prior to the end of the two-year period, accept employment with the holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service if, in the judgment of the State Ethics Commission, the Joint Legislative Committee on Ethical Standards, or the Supreme Court, as appropriate, such employment will not create a conflict of interest, or reasonable risk of the public perception of a conflict of interest, on the part of the employee.  In no case shall the restrictions of this subsection apply to a secretarial or clerical employee. Nothing herein contained shall alter or amend the post-service or post-employment restrictions applicable to members and employees of the Cannabis Regulatory Commission pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection c. of section 34 and section 35 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-27 and C.24:6I-28); and (c)   any partnership, firm, or corporation engaged in the practice of law or in providing any other professional services with which any person included in subparagraphs (a) and (c) of paragraph (1) of subsection a. of this section, or a member of the immediate family of that person, is associated, and any partner, officer, director, or employee thereof, other than that person, or immediate family member, may represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of any holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service in connection with any cause, application, or matter or any holding company or intermediary company with respect to such holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service in connection with any phase of development, permitting, licensing, or any other matter whatsoever related to medical cannabis activity or personal use cannabis activity, and that person or immediate family member shall not be barred from association with such partnership, firm, or corporation, if for a period of [two years] one year next subsequent to the termination of the person's office or employment, the person or immediate family member [(i)] is screened from personal participation in any such representation, appearance or negotiation[; and (ii) is associated with the partnership, firm, or corporation in a position which does not entail any equity interest in the partnership, firm, or corporation].  The exception provided in this subparagraph shall not apply to a former Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the General Assembly, to a person included in subparagraph (b) of paragraph (2) of subsection a. of this section, or to the members of their immediate families. d.    This section shall not apply to the spouse of a State officer or employee, which State officer or employee is without responsibility for matters affecting casino, medical cannabis, or personal use cannabis activity, who becomes the spouse subsequent to the State officer's or employee's appointment or employment as a State officer or employee and who is not individually or directly employed by a holder of, or applicant for, a casino license, medical cannabis permit, personal use cannabis license, or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service, or any holding or intermediary company thereof. e.     The Joint Legislative Committee on Ethical Standards and the State Ethics Commission, as appropriate, shall forthwith determine and publish, and periodically update, a list of those positions in State government with responsibility for matters affecting casino, medical cannabis activity, or personal use cannabis activity. f.  (1)  No person shall solicit or accept, directly or indirectly, any complimentary service or discount from any casino applicant or licensee which he knows or has reason to know is other than a service or discount that is offered to members of the general public in like circumstance. (2)   No person shall solicit or accept, directly or indirectly, any complimentary service or discount from any holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit issued pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license issued pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.) or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service which the person knows or has reason to know is other than a service or discount that is offered to members of the general public in like circumstance. g. (1) No person shall influence, or attempt to influence, by use of his official authority, the decision of the Casino Control Commission or the investigation of the Division of Gaming Enforcement in any application for casino licensure or in any proceeding to enforce the provisions of this act or the regulations of the commission. Any such attempt shall be promptly reported to the Attorney General; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be deemed to proscribe a request for information by any person concerning the status of any application for licensure or any proceeding to enforce the provisions of this act or the regulations of the commission. (2)   No person shall influence, or attempt to influence, by use of the person's official authority, the decision of the Cannabis Regulatory Commission in any application for a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license, or in any proceeding to enforce the provisions of P.L.1981, c.142 (C.52:13D-17.2 et al.), P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.), P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.), or the regulations of the Cannabis Regulatory Commission.  Any such attempt shall be promptly reported to the Attorney General; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be deemed to proscribe a request for information by any person concerning the status of any permit or license application, or any proceeding to enforce the provisions of P.L.1981, c.142 (C.52:13D-17.2 et al.), P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.), P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.), or the regulations of the Cannabis Regulatory Commission. h.    Any person who willfully violates the provisions of this section is a disorderly person and shall be subject to a fine not to exceed $1,000, or imprisonment not to exceed six months, or both. In addition, for violations of subsection c. of this section occurring after the effective date of P.L.2005, c.382, a civil penalty of not less than $500 nor more than $10,000 shall be imposed upon a former State officer or employee or former special State officer or employee of a State agency in the Executive Branch upon a finding of a violation by the State Ethics Commission, which penalty may be collected in a summary proceeding pursuant to the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999," P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.).2 (cf: P.L.2023, c.291, s.1) 2[2.] 4.2  This act shall take effect immediately.